Hawaii statutes.
[§431:31-102] Licensure of vendors.
(a) A vendor shall hold a limited lines license to sell or offer coverage
under a policy of portable electronics insurance.

(b) A limited lines license issued under this
section shall authorize any employee or authorized representative of the vendor
to sell or offer coverage under a policy of portable electronics insurance to a
customer at each location at which the vendor engages in portable electronics
transactions.

(c) The supervising entity shall maintain a registry
of vendor locations that are authorized to sell or solicit portable electronics
insurance coverage in the State. Upon request by the commissioner and with ten
days' notice to the supervising entity, the registry shall be open to
inspection and examination by the commissioner during regular business hours of
the supervising entity.

(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
license issued pursuant to this section shall authorize the licensee and its
employees or authorized representatives to engage in the activities that are
permitted in this section. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next